Massachusetts, session 194th, S1077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 221A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
section 1, as appearing in the 2010 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following
meanings:—
“Board”, the board of directors of the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation.
“Corporation”, the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation.
“Eligible client”, any indigent person or qualified small business land owner (“QSBLO”)
who is a resident of the commonwealth.
of 5

“Fee generating case”, any matter which, if undertaken on behalf of an eligible client by
an attorney in private practice, may reasonably be expected to result in payment of the fee of
such attorney from an award to the client or by the opposing party.
“Fiscal year”, the twelve-month period beginning on July first and ending on June
thirtieth.
“Fund”, the Legal Assistance Fund.
“Indigent person”, a person who receives public assistance under the Massachusetts Aid
to Families with Dependent Children, general relief or veterans’ benefits programs or receives
assistance under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, or the Medicaid Program, 42 USC 1396 to
1396(n), inclusive, or a person whose income, after taxes, is one hundred and twenty-five per
cent or less of the current poverty threshold annually established by the United States Office of
Management and Budget, or a person who is otherwise considered indigent due to hardship
circumstances under standards established by the board.
“Local program”, a qualified legal services program serving clients in an area limited to
certain counties, cities, or towns of the commonwealth.
“Qualified legal services program”, a nonprofit program which provides legal services in
civil cases without charge to indigent persons and has a board of directors composed of both
attorneys and consumers of legal services. Legal services programs which have been or are
funded in whole or in part by the Legal Services Corporation established pursuant to 42 USC
2996 to 2996(l), inclusive, shall be presumed to be qualified legal services programs.
of 5

“Qualified small business land owner” (“QSBLO”), a landowner owning, personally or
through a business entity, three or fewer properties whose annual income falls below guidelines
set by the Board or who property(ies) fall with the Loan to Value guideline ratios established by
the Board.
“Recipient”, a qualified legal services program receiving financial assistance under this
chapter.
“Statewide program”, a qualified legal services program serving eligible clients, or
providing support services to local programs throughout the commonwealth.
SECTION 2. Chapter 221A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
section 9, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 9. The corporation shall, subject to appropriation or to the amount of monies
available from the fund, or from funds made available from any other public or private source,
provide financial assistance to both local and statewide programs. In each fiscal year at least 80
per cent of such financial assistance shall be distributed to local programs on a basis
proportionate to the number of eligible clients within the service areas of such local programs.
Up to 20 per cent of such assistance may be distributed to statewide programs.
Eligible client calculations shall also consider parity amongst participants in landlord
tenant disputes to determine if the landlord of an eligible client tenant is also an eligible client as
a qualified small business land owner” (“QSBLO”). If a tenant pursuing legal action against his
or her landlord or a tenant involved in a Summary Process Action described in chapter 239 is
deemed eligible, before they may receive service the tenant’s landlord shall be notified and
of 5

evaluated for need. If the landlord is deemed eligible as a QSBLO then no legal service may be
provided to the eligible client tenant unless legal services are also provided to the eligible
landlord.
In the distribution of such assistance the corporation shall insure the maintenance of the
highest quality of service and professional standards, the preservation of attorney-client
relationships, and the protection of the integrity of the adversary process from any impairment,
and that recipients, consistent with goals established by the corporation, shall adopt procedures
for determining and implementing priorities for the provision of such assistance, taking into
account the relative needs of eligible clients for such assistance, including such outreach,
training, and support services as may be necessary, including, particularly, the needs for service
on the part of significant segments of the population of eligible clients with special difficulties of
access to legal services or special legal problems, including elderly and handicapped individuals,
and appropriate training and support services; and, in order to provide such assistance to such
significant segments of the population of eligible clients; that attorneys employed full time in
legal assistance activities supported in major part by the corporation refrain from any
compensated outside practice of law, and any uncompensated outside practice of law except as
authorized in guidelines promulgated by the corporation; and that no financial assistance
distributed pursuant to this chapter shall be used to provide legal assistance with respect to any
fee generating case, or to provide legal assistance with respect to any criminal proceeding or civil
action arising out of or brought for the purpose of challenging the validity of a criminal
conviction, or to provide services to persons who are not eligible clients; and that a substantial
amount of financial assistance distributed pursuant to this chapter shall be provided, under
of 5

standards established by the board, for compensation for legal services to indigent persons which
are provided by attorneys who engage in the private practice of law.
SECTION 3. The board of directors of the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation
shall establish guidelines for determining qualified small business land owners through income
or through the loan to value ratio of the property or properties.
of 5